Maine, session 132, LD1574.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5217-D, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2015, c. 482, §4, is
further amended to read:
B. A taxpayer may claim a credit based on loan payments actually made to a relevant
lender or lenders under this section only with respect to loans that are part of the
qualified individual's financial aid package and, for tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2015, only with respect to loan payment amounts paid by the taxpayer
during that part of the taxable year that the qualified individual worked in this State.
Payment For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2015 and prior to January 1,
2026, payment of loan amounts in excess of the amounts due during the taxable year
does not qualify for the credit. For tax years beginning before January 1, 2015,
refinanced loans that are part of the qualified individual’s financial aid package are
eligible for the credit under this section if the refinanced loans remain separate from
other debt, including debt incurred in an educational program other than the degree
program for which a credit is claimed under this section. For tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2015, refinanced loans or consolidated loans that are part of the
qualified individual's financial aid package are eligible for the credit under this section
if the refinanced loans or consolidated loans remain separate from other debt, except
for debt incurred in an educational program, but only in proportion to the portion of the
loan payments that are otherwise eligible under this section. Forbearance or deferment
of loan payments does not affect eligibility for the credit under this section. For tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, an individual who worked in this State for
any part of a month during the Maine residency period of the taxable year is considered
to have worked in this State for the entire month. For tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2015, an individual who worked outside this State for an entire month during
the Maine residency period is considered to have worked in this State during that
month, except that in no case may this exception exceed 3 months during the Maine
residency period of the taxable year.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5217-E, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 635, Pt. H, §15,
is amended to read:
C. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022 and before January 1, 2027
2026, a qualified individual with unused carryover credits pursuant to section 5217‑D,
subsection 2, paragraph A from the credit for educational opportunity generated in the
10 years from January 1, 2012 to December 31, 2021 may carry over and apply to the
credit amount allowed pursuant to this section the portion, as reduced from year to
year, of any unused credits. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a
qualified individual with unused carryover credits may carry over and apply to the
credit amount allowed pursuant to this section the portion, as reduced from year to
year, of any unused credits.